en: Compound chocolates, Chocolate substitutes
de: Schokoladenersatz
fr: Succédanés du chocolat, Substituts du chocolat
hr: Složene čokolade
ja: 凖チョコレート

en: Fruit confectioneries
fr: Confiseries aux fruits
hr: Voćne slastice
lt: Vaisiniai saldumynai, saldumynai su vaisiais

en: Candied fruits
de: Kandierte Früchte
es: Frutas confitadas
fi: sokeroidut hedelmät
fr: Fruits confits
hr: Kandirano voće
lt: Cukruoti vaisiai
nl: Gekonfijt fruit

en: Candied lemon
de: Kandierte Zitrone
es: Limón confitado
fr: Citron confit
hr: Ušećereni limun
it: Cedro candito
nl: Gekonfijte citroen

en: Candied lime
fr: Citron vert confit

en: Filled dates
bg: Пълнени фурми
da: Fyldte dadler
fr: Dattes fourrées
sv: Dadlar med fyllning

en: Flavoured dried dates, Flavored dried dates
da: Tørrede dadler med smag
sv: Torkade dadlar med smak

en: Cola-flavoured dried dates
da: Tørrede dadler med cola-smag
sv: Torkade dadlar med kolasmak

en: Succade, Candied citrus fruit peel
da: Sukat
de: Sukkade, Aranzini
fr: Sukkatti
hr: Sukada
is: Súkkat
nl: Sukade
pl: cykata
ru: цукаты
sv: Suckat

en: Candied orange zest
de: Orangeat
fr: Zeste d'orange confit
hr: Kandirana narančina korica

en: Candied lemon zest
de: Zitronat, Citronat
fr: Citronnat
hr: Ušećerena limunova korica

en: Cotton candy, fairy floss, candy floss
de: Zuckerwatte, Gesponnener Zucker
es: Algodón de azúcar, nube de algodón
fi: Hattara
fr: Barbes à papa
hr: Šećerna vuna
it: Zucchero filato
ja: 綿菓子, 綿飴
lt: Cukraus vatos, cukraus vata
nl: Suikerspin

en: Calissons
xx: Calissons
de: Calissons
fr: Calissons
hr: Calissons
it: Calissons
nl: Calissons

en: Calissons d'Aix, Calissons of Aix, Melon and almond candy on a unleavened bread layer
xx: Calissons d'Aix
de: Calissons d'Aix, Calissons aus Aix-en-Provence
fr: Calissons d'Aix, Calissons d'Aix en Provence
hr: Calissons d'aix
it: Calissons d'Aix
nl: Calissons d'Aix

en: Chocolates
bg: Шоколади
ca: Xocolata
cs: Čokolády
da: Chokolader, chokolade
de: Schokoladen, Schokolade
es: Chocolates
fi: suklaat
fr: Chocolats, chocolat, Chocolat en tablette
he: שוקולדים
hr: čokolade, čokolada
hu: Csokoládék
it: Cioccolato
ja: チョコレート
lt: Šokoladai
nl: Chocolade
pl: Czekolada
pt: Chocolates
ro: Ciocolată, ciocolata
ru: Шоколад, шоколадные продукты
sv: Choklad
th: ช็อกโกแลต
tr: Çikolatalar, Çikolatalı ürünler
zh: 巧克力

en: Chocolates from Modica IGP
fr: Chocolats de Modica IGP
hr: Čokolade od modica igp
it: Cioccolato di Modica IGP, Cioccolato di Modica
nl: Chocola uit Modica IGP

en: Assorted chocolates
de: Verschiedene Schokoladen
es: Surtido de chocolates
fi: suklaasekoitus
fr: Assortiments de chocolats, assortiment de chocolat
hr: Razne čokolade
hu: Csokoládé válogatás
it: Assortimento di cioccolati
lt: Įvairūs šokoladai
nl: Chocolade-assortimenten
zh: 什锦巧克力

en: Plant milk chocolates
fi: Kasvimaitosuklaat
fr: Chocolats au lait végétal
hr: Biljne mliječne čokolade
nl: Plantaardige melkchocolade, Plantaardige melkchocolades

en: Dark chocolate bar
fr: Chocolats noirs en tablette

en: Milk chocolates, milk chocolate
bg: Млечен шоколад
ca: Xocolata amb llet
cs: Mléčné čokolády
da: Lys chokolader, lys chokolade, mælkechokolader, mælkechokolade
de: Milchschokoladen
es: Chocolates con leche
fi: maitosuklaat
fr: Chocolats au lait, chocolat au lait
he: שוקולד חלב
hr: Mliječne čokolade
hu: Tejcsokoládé
it: Cioccolato al latte
ja: ミルクチョコレート
lt: Pieniniški šokoladai, Pieniniai šokoladai, Šokoladai iš pieno
nl: Melkchocoladen
pl: Czekolada mleczna
pt: Chocolates de leite, chocolate de leite
ro: Ciocolată cu lapte
ru: Молочный шоколад, Шоколад молочный
sv: Mjölkchoklad, ljus choklad
tr: Sütlü çikolata
zh: 牛奶巧克力